Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2708
Allegation of wrongdoing or violation of employee protection; official; powers.

An official who receives an allegation of wrongdoing or of a violation of section 81-2705 may conduct a preliminary investigation of such allegation or submit such allegation to the Public Counsel for investigation pursuant to section 81-2704 or 81-2706. A copy of any written findings issued by the Public Counsel pursuant to such an investigation shall be transmitted to the official submitting the allegation.

Laws 1993, LB 44, § 8.